Idaho, session 2026, S1384.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Public Utilities Commission $35,400 from
the Public Utilities Commission Fund to be expended for capital outlay for
the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.